Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1117.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; crime lab The sum of $__________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for crime laboratory services to process and test evidence submitted by law enforcement agencies from counties with less than one million persons.